Utah statutes.
13-35-205.   Liability for damages to motor vehicles in transit -- Disclosure required.

(1) (a)  A franchisee is solely liable for damage to a new powersport vehicle after delivery by and acceptance from the carrier.

(b)  A delivery receipt or bill of lading, or similar document, signed by a franchisee is evidence of a franchisee's acceptance of a new powersport vehicle.

(2)  A franchisor is liable for all damage to a powersport vehicle before delivery to and acceptance by the franchisee, including that time in which the vehicle is in the control of a carrier or transporter.

(3)  A franchisor shall disclose to the franchisee any repairs made prior to delivery, only if the cost of the repair exceeds 3% of the manufacturer's wholesale price, as measured by retail repair costs.

(4)  Notwithstanding Subsections (1), (2), and (3), the franchisee is liable for damage to a new powersport vehicle after delivery to the carrier or transporter if the franchisee selected:

(a)  the method and mode of transportation; and

(b)  the carrier or transporter.



Enacted by Chapter 234, 2002 General Session

